Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 2 State Purchases
37-2-66.
Solicitation — Public agency.

A solicitation shall be prepared which describes the public agency’s requirements and sets forth the evaluation criteria. It shall be distributed to interested persons.

For services reasonably estimated to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), the committee may require an informational conference be held which describes the criteria to be used in evaluating the statement of qualification, performance data, and selection of firms. Criteria shall include, but is not limited to:

Competence to perform the services as reflected by technical training and education; general experience; experience in providing the required services; and the qualifications and competence of persons who would be assigned to perform the services;

Ability to perform the services as reflected by workload and the availability of adequate personnel, equipment, and facilities to perform the services expeditiously;

Past performance as reflected by the evaluation of private persons and officials of other governmental entities that have retained the services of the firm with respect to such factors as control of costs, quality of work, and an ability to meet deadlines; and

The proposed approach to the project, where applicable.

The scope of work shall be discussed and further defined at the bidder’s conference, including on-site visits, if appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 367, § 1.

37-2-67.
Evaluation of qualifications and performance data.

The chief purchasing officer shall evaluate:

Statements that may be submitted in response to the solicitation of architectural or engineering services; and

Statements of qualifications and performance data, if their submission was required.

All statements and statements of qualifications and performance data shall be evaluated in light of the criteria set forth in the solicitation for architectural, engineering, or consultant services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2.

37-2-68.
Final selection — Public agency — Directors.

The chief purchasing officer shall select no more than (3) firms (or two (2) if only two (2) apply) evaluated as being professionally and technically qualified. The firms selected, if still interested in providing the services, shall make a representative available to the directors of the public agency at such time and place as they shall determine, to provide such further information as they may require.

The directors of the public agency shall negotiate with the highest qualified firm for a contract for architectural, engineering, or consultant services for the public agency at compensation which the directors determine to be fair and reasonable to the public agency. In making the determination, the directors shall take into account the professional competence of the offerors, the technical merits of the offerors, and the price for which the services are to be rendered. The directors of the public agency shall be responsible for the final selection of the providers of architectural, engineering, or consultant services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2.

37-2-69.
Provision of architectural, engineering, or consultant services not exceeding twenty thousand dollars.

State agencies. (1) For every state project requiring architectural or engineering services, the fees for which are not reasonably expected to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), the state agency shall forward to the chief purchasing officer a request for those services through the state purchasing office.

(2)

For every state agency project requiring consultant services, the fees for which are not reasonably expected to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), the state agency shall forward to the chief purchasing officer a request for such services through the state purchasing office with a proposed scope of work and, if possible, the names of three recommended qualified contractors, along with a written evaluation of the qualifications of each potential contractor.

(3)

The purchasing agent shall request offers from potential contractors in writing and shall notify potential contractors that any contract resulting from such solicitation shall not exceed a total value of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), including change orders.

(4)

The chief purchasing officer shall be responsible for the final selection of a qualified architectural, engineering, or consultant firm for the project and shall so inform the purchasing agent. The chief purchasing officer shall use the criteria set forth in §

37-2-61

in making that determination. The determination shall be justified in writing.

Public agencies. For every public agency project requiring architectural, engineering, or consultant services, the fees for which are not reasonably expected to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), the public agency chief operating officer shall be responsible for the final selection of a qualified architectural, engineering, or consultant firm for the project. The public agency chief operating officer shall notify the board of directors of the public agency of that selection.

The public agency chief operating officer shall use the criteria set forth in §

37-2-66

in making the determination. That determination shall be justified in writing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 367, § 1.

37-2-70.
Professional services — Legal.

Before a state governmental entity procures the services of an attorney, a state agency shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the chief purchasing officer or a public agency shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the directors of the public agency the following:

The need for the services, including the scope of the services to be performed;

That no legal personnel employed by the state on a full-time basis is available to perform those services;

That funding is available, indicating from which sources the funding is to be provided;

That attorneys to be engaged meet the following minimum requirements:

Appropriate professional licensing;

Competence to perform those services as reflected by formal training and education, general experience, experience in providing the required services, and the qualifications and competence of persons who would be assigned to perform the services; and

Ability to perform the services as reflected by workload and availability of adequate personnel, equipment, and facilities to perform the services expeditiously.

The attorney shall enter into a letter of engagement with the state. The letter of engagement shall state the rate of compensation, the scope of the services to be performed for the compensation, and provision for the payment of expenses incurred in connection with legal services. The letter of engagement shall certify that the rate of compensation does not exceed the rate of compensation charged by counsel to his or her preferred public or private clients. A letter of engagement shall not be for more than one year.

Nothing herein shall prevent the issuance of a public solicitation of requests for qualifications or the conduct of pricing negotiations prior to contract award. All requests for qualifications shall be solicited through utilization of the Rhode Island vendor information program (RIVIP) as set forth in §

37-2-17.1

.

Each state department and each state government entity which procures the services of an attorney who is not an employee of that department or body shall, on or before March 1 of each year, prepare and submit to the director of the department of administration an annual report of outside legal services, which report shall identify and set forth:

The name, firm, affiliation, and address of each attorney or law firm retained by the department or entity during the previous calendar year and/or of each attorney or law firm to whom the department or entity paid any fees or other payments during the previous calendar year;

The amount of all fees or other payments from public funds made by the department or entity to any such attorney or law firm during the previous calendar year.

The director of the department of administration shall annually compile all annual reports of outside legal services and present them, together with an executive summary thereof, to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the chairpersons of the senate and house committees on finance, not later than May 1 of each year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 422, § 1.

37-2-71.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1999, ch. 367, § 4, effective July 2, 1999.

37-2-72.
Professional services — Medical and dental consultant services.

Before a state governmental entity procures the services of an individual consulting physician or dentist, it shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the chief purchasing officer the following:

The need for the services, including the scope of the services to be performed;

That no medical or dental personnel employed by the state on a full-time basis is available to perform the services;

That funding is available, indicating from which sources the funding is to be provided; and

That medical or dental consultants to be engaged meet the following minimum requirements:

Appropriate professional license or certification; and

Competence to perform the services as reflected by formal training and education, general experience, and experience in providing the required services.

Medical or dental services which are not provided by individual consulting physicians and dentists shall be obtained through competitive solicitation procedures where service providers shall demonstrate that they possess appropriate professional licenses or certifications and competence to perform the services — as reflected by formal training and education, general experience and experience in providing the required services.

Nothing herein shall prevent the issuance of a public solicitation of requests for qualifications or the conduct of pricing negotiations prior to contract award. All requests for qualifications shall be solicited through utilization of the Rhode Island vendor information program (RIVIP) as set forth in §

37-2-17.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 367, § 1.

37-2-73.
Purchasing of pest control services — Effect of an order by the director of environmental management.

Upon receipt of an order from the director of environmental management pursuant to §

23-25-28(a)(1)

, the purchasing agent shall take such steps as are necessary to insure that the named business or commercial applicator shall not be eligible to receive state contracts for pest control services for the duration of the period enumerated in the director’s order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2.

37-2-74.
Printing, binding, advertising, and election expenses.

All printing, binding, advertising, and election expenses in connection with all primaries and elections, advertising Rhode Island, and all legislative printing, including the printing of the public laws and acts and resolves, shall be purchased by the secretary of state and in respect to those purchases, the department of state shall be exempt from the requirements of this chapter which relate to the function of purchasing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 224, § 2.

37-2-75.
Prohibition against the use of lead based paints.

When purchasing paint products or contracting or subcontracting for painting, construction, improvement, completion, or repair of any public building, any public road, any public bridge, or any public construction, all governmental bodies and public agencies, as defined by §§

37-2-7(11)

and

37-2-7(16)

, shall be prohibited from the use of lead based paint.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 382, § 2.

37-2-76.
State purchase of recycled products.

The state shall, through its purchasing policy and practice, affirmatively promote the use of recycled products. The department of administration in conjunction with the department of environmental management shall, through regulations, establish a time table requiring increased utilization by the state of recycled products. In January of each year, the department of administration shall report to the general assembly the state’s progress in utilizing recycled products materials and supplies for the preceding twelve (12) months.

With respect to office paper products, at least fifty percent (50%) of the expenditure for office paper products purchased by the state of Rhode Island, its agencies, and departments, shall be recycled paper products by fiscal year 1995.

The department of administration in conjunction with the department of environmental management shall annually establish comprehensive technical specifications based on research by the department of environmental management for the recycled products, materials, and supplies to be purchased by the state under this section. These specifications shall include the minimum performance and quality attributes as well as minimum preconsumer and post-consumer content.

The director of the department of administration, acting as chief purchasing officer of the state, shall direct that all subsequent purchases of the subject recycled products, materials, and supplies by the state, its agencies, and departments shall meet the source certification of pre-consumer and/or post-consumer content standards established under subsection (c) of this section.

Subsequent discovery by the state, its agencies, or departments that products delivered by vendors to the state as “recycled products” do not satisfy the specifications of “recycled” content stated in the award, shall be grounds for the return of all discrepant goods, refunding of all money paid, termination of all outstanding contracts and orders, and at the discretion of the chief purchasing officer suspension of the vendor’s involvement in state procurement for a period of up to twenty-four (24) months.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 402, § 2.

37-2-76.1.
Additional definitions.

For the purposes of §

37-2-76

:

“Office paper products” means any paper used by the state for the purpose of writing, printing, copying, and/or typing, including, but not limited to, computer, bond, xerographic, forms and/or duplicator paper, envelopes, business cards, index cards, and writing pads, either white or colored.

“Post-consumer content” means those materials generated by a business or consumer which have served their intended end uses and which have been separated or diverted from solid waste. Printer’s waste, lathe wastes, and other wastes generated during production of an end product and undistributed finished products are not “post-consumer content”.

“Preconsumer content” means any material generated during any steps in the production of an end product, but does not include any waste material or by product that can be reused or has been normally reused within the same plant or another plant of the same parent company.

“Recycled product” shall mean a product containing preconsumer content and post-consumer content.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 402, § 2.

37-2-77.
International Trade Agreements — Procurement rules — General Assembly approval.

As used in this section, “International Trade Agreement” means a trade agreement between the federal government and a foreign country to which the state, at the request of the federal government, is a party. International Trade Agreement does not include a trade agreement between the state and a foreign country to which the federal government is not a party.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, state officials, including the governor, may not:

Commit the state to the government procurement rules of an “International Trade Agreement”; or

Give consent to the federal government to commit the state to the government procurement rules of an International Trade Agreement.

The governor may commit the state or give consent to the federal government to commit the state to the government procurement rules of an International Trade Agreement only if the general assembly enacts legislation that explicitly authorizes the governor to commit the state or give consent to the federal government to commit the state to the government procurement rules of a specific International Trade Agreement.

Any consent that a state official, including the governor, has given for the state to be committed by the government procurement rules of any International Trade Agreement on or before the effective date of this section [June 23, 2006] is declared invalid and the state is not committed by the government procurement rules of any International Trade Agreement for which a state official, including the governor, has given consent for the state to be committed to on or before the effective date of this section [June 23, 2006].

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 647, § 1.

37-2-78.
Severability.

If any part or provision of this chapter or the application of any part or provision to any person, entity, or circumstances is judged invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, the judgment shall be confined in its operation to the part of or provision of or application directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment has been rendered and shall not affect or impair the validity of the remainder of this law or its application to other persons, entities, or circumstances.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 647, § 1.

37-2-79.
Establishment of the Rhode Island Strategic Purchasing Advisory Commission.

In order to provide a means of collaboration between the state, cities/towns and school committees a permanent advisory commission is established named the “Rhode Island Strategic Purchasing Advisory Commission.” This Advisory Commission will consist of nine (9) members including: (1) the state purchasing agent or his or her designee, who will serve as chair, (2) a designee of the board of regents of the Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education, (3) a designee of the board of governors of higher education, (4) a designee of the Rhode Island School Committees Association, (5) a designee of the Rhode Island League of Cities and Towns, (6) a designee of the Association of School Business Officials, (7) a designee of the Rhode Island Municipal Purchasing Agents Association, (8) a designee of the Rhode Island economic development corporation and, (9) a designee of the state budget officer.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 38, § 22.

37-2-80.
Selection of vendors and services with place of business located in Rhode Island.

The State of Rhode Island has a large number of well-qualified vendors and service-oriented businesses. In instances where contracts are entirely supported by state funds and two (2) or more vendors or service providers are judged to be equal on all other factors, the chief purchasing officer shall select a vendor or service provider whose headquarters or primary place of business is located within the state or secondly select those entities that propose a joint venture with a vendor or service provider whose headquarters or primary place of business is within the state.

This section shall not apply to contracts that are financed in part or in their entirety by the federal government, including, but not limited to, contracts supported by the Federal Highway Administration (FHA), the Federal Railroad Administration (FRA), the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) or the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA).

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 250, § 1.

37-2-81.
Authority to conduct state and national background checks for vendors with access to federal tax information.

Definitions. As used in this section, the following terms shall be defined as follows:

“Access,” shall mean the direct and indirect use, contact, handling or viewing of federal tax information, as defined herein, in paper or electronic form, regardless of the frequency, likelihood or extent of such access or whether the access is intentional or inadvertent.

“Agency” or “state agency,” shall mean a Rhode Island state department within the executive branch.

“Agency head” shall mean the director or designee of a state department for which the vendor is providing services.

“Division” shall mean the division of purchases.

“Federal tax information” or “FTI” shall mean:

Federal tax returns or information created or derived from federal tax returns that is in an agency’s possession or control, which is covered by the confidentiality protections of the Internal Revenue Code and subject to 26 U.S.C. § 6103(p)(4) safeguarding requirements, including oversight by the Internal Revenue Service (“IRS”); and is received directly from the IRS or obtained through an authorized secondary source, such as the Social Security Administration (SSA), Federal Office of Child Support Enforcement (OCSE), Bureau of the Fiscal Service (BFS), Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS), or another entity acting on behalf of the IRS pursuant to an Internal Revenue Code (“IRC”) 6103(p)(2)(B) agreement; and

Shall not include federal tax returns or information created or derived from federal tax returns received directly from taxpayers or other third-parties.

“Vendor” shall mean any individual, firm, corporation, partnership or other corporate entity, including employees, subcontractors, who are performing services for the state and has access, as defined herein, to FTI.

The agency head shall require a vendor to complete a state and national fingerprint-based criminal background check, as authorized by Public Law 92-544, to determine the suitability of a vendor’s employees and subcontractors if the services to the state require or include, or may require or include, access to FTI. This requirement for a vendor shall be incorporated by reference into the vendor’s agreement with the state. No new vendor employee or subcontractor who has or may have access to FTI shall perform services for the State until the person is deemed suitable by the agency head. Existing vendor employees and subcontractors, as of September 1, 2019, shall complete the background check requirement within a reasonable time as approved by the agency head.

The national fingerprint-based criminal background check shall be facilitated through the Rhode Island office of the attorney general or other law enforcement authorized agency, using the same criteria established under §

36-3-16

for applicants and current state employees. The information shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) for a national criminal history check, according to the policies, procedures, and/or regulations established by the office of the attorney general or other law enforcement authorized agency. The office of the attorney general or other law enforcement authorized agency may disseminate the results of the national criminal background checks to the Department of Administration and/or the agency head where the services are being provided.

Reciprocity. Nothing herein shall prevent the agency head, at his or her discretion, from accepting a recent national fingerprint-based criminal background check for a vendor related to FTI access conducted in another suitable jurisdiction.

The agency head may receive criminal offender record information to the extent required by federal law and the results of checks of national criminal history information databases under Public Law 92-544. Upon receipt of the results of state and national criminal background checks, the agency head shall treat the information as non-public and exempt from disclosure in accordance with the Rhode Island access to public records act, §

38-2-2(4)(B)

. Information acquired by any agency in the background check process pursuant to this section shall be used solely for the purpose of making a determination as to the suitability of a vendor in a position which requires or includes, or may require or include, access to FTI.

The state shall not be responsible for any fees charged through the office attorney general, other law enforcement authorized agency or other jurisdiction to conduct the state and national background check for vendor.

A vendor who refuses to comply with the fingerprint-based background check requirement shall be considered unsuitable for services requiring or involving, or which may require or involve, access to FTI. Refusal to comply by the vendor may result in termination of the contract with the State and/or other procurement sanctions if appropriate. Nothing herein shall prevent the vendor from replacing an employee or subcontractor who refuses to comply with this requirement, subject to written approval by the agency head.

Upon receipt of the results of a state and national criminal background check for the vendor the agency head shall review the results and determine the suitability of the person with regard to service in a position requiring or involving, or which may require or involve, access to FTI. In making a determination of suitability, the agency head may consider mitigating factors relevant to the vendor’s scope of work and the nature of any disqualifying offense. Unsuitability of a vendor may result in termination of the contract with the state and/or a requirement that the vendor replace the employee or subcontractor, with a suitable person, subject to written approval by the agency head.

If the office of the attorney general or other law enforcement authorized agency receives criminal record information from the state or national fingerprint-based criminal background checks that includes no disposition or is otherwise incomplete, the subject person shall be responsible for resolving any issues in other jurisdictions causing an incomplete background check. The vendor shall immediately notify the state in writing the name and circumstances of any employees or subcontractors who have received an incomplete background check. Failure to establish suitability of a vendor employee, subcontractor or other agent may result in termination of the contract with the state and/or a requirement that the vendor replace the employee, subcontractor or other agent with a suitable person, subject to written approval by the agency head.

Nothing in this section shall limit or preclude an agency’s right to carry on a background investigation of a vendor using other authorized means.

The department of administration is hereby authorized to promulgate and adopt regulations necessary to carry out this section.

The judicial branch is hereby authorized to comply with the provisions herein related to vendors working on behalf of the judiciary receiving access to FTI.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 3, § 7.